Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB984.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1104 of Title 65 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1104. Statement of financial interests required to be filed.* * *(c.1) Write-in candidate.--A write-in candidate shall file a statement of financial interests within 30 days of having been nominated or elected unless the person declines the nomination or office within that period of time. The following shall apply:(1) The statement of financial interests shall be filed with the commission for State-level public office and with the governing authority of the political subdivision in which the person has been elected or nominated for county or local-123456789101112131415161718 level office.(2) For the purposes of calculating the 30-day period during which the statement of financial interests shall be filed, the time shall commence on the date that the appropriate board of elections certifies the person as the winner of a nomination or election.(3) If a write-in candidate is nominated and fails to file a statement of financial interests under this subsection, the write-in candidate shall not appear on the ballot.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0984PN1074 - 2 - 123456789101112